Utah statutes.
9-6-301.   Creation -- Members.

(1)  There is created the Utah Arts Council.

(2)  Members of the council may be of the following four classes:

(a)  members of the board;

(b)  honorary members;

(c)  annual members; and

(d)  life members.

